Illinois, session 104th, SB901.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Eminent Domain Act is amended by changing 5Section 1-1-1 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 30/1-1-1)7    Sec. 1-1-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Eminent Domain Act.9(Source: P.A. 94-1055, eff. 1-1-07.)